Connecticut, session 2026, SB00375.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection may, within available
appropriations, administer a program to provide grants to
municipalities and municipal police departments for services to provide
school mapping data that meets the requirements described in
subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Any municipality or municipal police department may apply for
a grant for services to provide school mapping data for one or more
schools within the municipality or the municipality served by the
municipal police department, as applicable, provided such school
mapping data:
(1) Is compatible with software platforms used by local, state and
federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the
specific school for which the data is provided without requiring such
agencies to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or
access the data;

Senate Bill No. 375
(2) Is compatible with security software platforms used by the
specific school for which the data is provided without requiring the local
or regional board of education or local, state and federal public safety
agencies that provide emergency services to the specific school for
which the data is provided to purchase additional software or pay a fee
to view or access the data;
(3) Is in a printable format and, if requested, in a digital file format
that can be integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;
(4) Is verified for accuracy by the entity producing the data by
conducting a walk-through of the school buildings and grounds being
mapped;
(5) Is oriented true north;
(6) Includes accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial
imagery of the school campus;
(7) Contains site-specific labels that match the structure of school
buildings, including room labels, hallway names, external door or
stairwell numbers and the location of hazards, critical utility locations,
key boxes, automated external defibrillators and trauma kits;
(8) Contains site-specific labels that match the school grounds,
including parking areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads and
neighboring properties;
(9) Is overlaid with gridded "x" and "y" coordinates;
(10) Cannot be modified or updated independently without
corresponding updates to school mapping data within software
platforms used by local, state and federal public safety agencies that
provide emergency services to the specific school for which the data is
provided; and
Public Act No. 26-116 2 of 3

Senate Bill No. 375
(11) Will be provided to the local or regional board of education and
local, state and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency
services to the specific school for which the data is provided at no cost
beyond the initial cost of producing such mapping data, and shall be
available to such board and agencies permanently.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the department shall develop
eligibility criteria, application forms and deadlines for such program
and post in a conspicuous location on the department's Internet web site
a description of the grant program that includes, but is not limited to,
such criteria, forms and deadlines.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
safety and security. Such report shall include information for the
preceding calendar year on the number of applications for grants that
were received, the number of grants that were awarded and a list of the
municipalities and municipal police departments that received services
for school mapping data pursuant to such grants.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-116 3 of 3